Montana, session 2025, HB73.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MONTANA:

NEW SECTION. Section 1. Repealer. The following section of the Montana Code Annotated is
repealed:
87-5-209. Destruction of eagles or predatory hawks and owls.

NEW SECTION. Section 2. Effective date. [This act] is effective on passage and approval.
- END -
- 1 - Authorized Print Version – HB 73